Massachusetts, session 194th, S3027.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 265 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section XX the
following section: Section XX.
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Cause” or “causation”, an act which, in a natural and continuous sequence, results in
death or serious bodily injury, and without which death or injury would not have occurred.
“Coercive control”, a pattern of behavior intended to threaten, intimidate, harass, isolate,
control, coerce or compel compliance of another person that causes that person to reasonably
fear physical harm or have a reduced sense of physical safety or autonomy.
“Harassment”, an act directed at a specific person that seriously alarms or annoys such
person and would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress including,
but not limited to, an act conducted by mail or by use of a telephonic or telecommunication
of 3

device or electronic communication device including, but not limited to, a device that transfers
signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data or intelligence of any nature, transmitted in whole or
in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic or photo-optical system including, but
not limited to, electronic mail, internet communications, instant messages and facsimile
communications.
“Intellectual disability”, a significant limitation in both intellectual functioning and
adaptive behavior.
“Mental illness”, a diagnosable mental, behavioral, or emotional disorder.
“Serious bodily injury”, bodily injury which results in a permanent disfigurement,
protracted loss or impairment of a bodily function, limb or organ, or substantial risk of death.
(b) Any person who:
(1) willfully intimidates, threatens, harasses, or exerts undue influence or coercive control
over another person; and
(2) such conduct causes serious bodily injury or death to the other, whether or not self-
inflicted, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 3 years, or in
the house of correction for not more than 2 years. Any person who is placed on probation under
this section shall be required to complete an educational program established by the District
Attorney’s Office that commenced the prosecution.
(c) Any person who engages in the conduct described in subsection (b) and:
(1) knew or should have known that the victim has a mental illness or an intellectual
disability as defined in section (a); or
of 3

(2) there exists more than a 10 year age difference between the defendant and the victim
and the victim is under 18 years of age; or
(3) the defendant was a mandated reporter as defined in section 21 of chapter 119 shall be
punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 5 years, or the house of
correction for not more than two and a half years. Prosecutions commenced under this subsection
shall neither be continued without a finding nor placed on file.
of 3